Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-623
Unlawful circulation of a financial transaction device in the second degree; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of unlawful circulation of a financial transaction device in the second degree if such person sells or has in his or her possession or under his or her control with the intent to deliver, circulate, or sell any financial transaction device which he or she knows or reasonably should know to be lost, stolen, forged, altered, counterfeited, or delivered under a mistake as to the identity or address of the account holder.

(2) Any person committing the offense of unlawful circulation of a financial transaction device in the second degree shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1989, LB 372, § 6.